Illinois, session 104th, SB2172.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/4)  (from Ch. 116, par. 204)7    Sec. 4. Each public body shall prominently display on its 8website at each of its administrative or regional offices, 9make available for inspection and copying, and send through 10the mail if requested, each of the following:11        (a) A brief description of itself, which will include, 12    but not be limited to, a short summary of its purpose, a 13    block diagram giving its functional subdivisions, the 14    total amount of its operating budget, the number and 15    location of all of its separate offices, the approximate 16    number of full and part-time employees, and the 17    identification and membership of any board, commission, 18    committee, or council which operates in an advisory 19    capacity relative to the operation of the public body, or 20    which exercises control over its policies or procedures, 21    or to which the public body is required to report and be 22    answerable for its operations; and23        (b) A brief description of the methods whereby the   SB2172- 2 -LRB104 08953 BDA 19008 b1    public may request information and public records, a 2    directory designating the Freedom of Information officer 3    or officers, the address where requests for public records 4    should be directed, and any fees allowable under Section 6 5    of this Act.6    If a A public body does not maintain that maintains a 7website, it shall also post this information at each of its 8administrative or regional offices on its website. 9(Source: P.A. 96-542, eff. 1-1-10; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.)